Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.240

Acts, records, and proceedings of Indian tribe or band given full faith and credit.

The courts of this state shall give full faith and credit as provided for in the United States Constitution to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of any Indian tribe or band in any proceeding brought pursuant to this chapter to the same extent that full faith and credit is given to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of any other state.

[ 1979 c 155 s 52.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.